Illinois, session 104th, HB4775.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois State Police Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by changing Section 62605-51 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2605/2605-51)8    Sec. 2605-51. Division of the Academy and Training.9    (a) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 10exercise, but not be limited to, the following functions:11        (1) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police 12    Training Academy.13        (2) Train and prepare new officers for a career in law 14    enforcement, with innovative, quality training and 15    educational practices.16        (3) Offer continuing training and educational programs 17    for Illinois State Police employees.18        (4) Oversee the Illinois State Police's recruitment 19    initiatives.20        (5) Oversee and operate the Illinois State Police's 21    quartermaster.22        (6) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 23    Article 5, Chapter 11 of the Illinois Vehicle Code   HB4775- 2 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    concerning testing and training officers on the detection 2    of impaired driving.3        (7) Duties assigned to the Illinois State Police in 4    Article 108B of the Code of Criminal Procedure. 5    (a-5) Successful completion of the Illinois State Police 6Academy satisfies the minimum standards pursuant to 7subsections (a), (b), and (d) of Section 7 of the Illinois 8Police Training Act and exempts Illinois State Police officers 9from the Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board's 10State Comprehensive Examination and Equivalency Examination. 11Satisfactory completion shall be evidenced by a commission or 12certificate issued to the officer. 13    (a-10) Successful completion of in-service training by the 14Illinois State Police shall satisfy the minimum standards 15under Section 10.6 of the Illinois Police Training Act and 16shall satisfy the ongoing training requirements for a 17certification waiver, including scenario-based and mandatory 18firearms training. Satisfactory completion shall be evidenced 19by a commission or certificate issued to the officer, 20documentation of separation from the Illinois State Police in 21good standing reference training requirements, or both a 22commission or certificate issued to the officer and 23documentation of separation from the Illinois State Police in 24good standing reference training requirements. 25    (b) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 26exercise the rights, powers, and duties vested in the former   HB4775- 3 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1Division of State Troopers by Section 17 of the Illinois State 2Police Act.3    (c) Specialized training. The Division of the Academy and 4Training shall provide the following specialized training: 5        (1) Crash reconstruction specialist; training. The 6    Division of the Academy and Training shall cooperate with 7    the Division of Forensic Services to provide specialized 8    training in crash reconstruction for Illinois State Police 9    officers. Only Illinois State Police officers who 10    successfully complete the training may be assigned as 11    crash reconstruction specialists.12        (2) Death and homicide investigations; training. The 13    Division of the Academy and Training shall provide 14    training in death and homicide investigation for Illinois 15    State Police officers. Only Illinois State Police officers 16    who successfully complete the training may be assigned as 17    lead investigators in death and homicide investigations. 18    Satisfactory completion of the training shall be evidenced 19    by a certificate issued to the officer by the Division of 20    the Academy and Training. The Director shall develop a 21    process for waiver applications for officers whose prior 22    training and experience as homicide investigators may 23    qualify them for a waiver. The Director may issue a 24    waiver, at his or her discretion, based solely on the 25    prior training and experience of an officer as a homicide 26    investigator.  HB4775- 4 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1            (A) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 2        require all homicide investigator training to include 3        instruction on victim-centered, trauma-informed 4        investigation. This training must be implemented by 5        July 1, 2023.6            (B) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 7        cooperate with the Division of Criminal Investigation 8        to develop a model curriculum on victim-centered, 9        trauma-informed investigation. This curriculum must be 10        implemented by July 1, 2023. 11        (3) Investigation of officer-involved criminal sexual 12    assault; training. The Division of the Academy and 13    Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 14    Investigation to provide a specialized criminal sexual 15    assault and sexual abuse investigation training program 16    for Illinois State Police officers. Only Illinois State 17    Police officers who successfully complete the training may 18    be assigned as investigators in officer-involved criminal 19    sexual assault investigations under Section 10 of the Law 20    Enforcement Criminal Sexual Assault Investigation Act. 21        (4) Investigation of officer-involved deaths; 22    training. The Division of the Academy and Training shall 23    have a written policy regarding the investigation of 24    officer-involved deaths that involve a law enforcement 25    officer employed by the Illinois State Police as required 26    under Section 1-10 of the Police and Community Relations   HB4775- 5 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    Improvement Act and shall provide specialized training in 2    that policy for Illinois State Police officers. 3        (5) Juvenile specialist; training. The Division of the 4    Academy and Training shall provide specialized juvenile 5    training for Illinois State Police officers who meet the 6    definition of "juvenile police officer" as defined under 7    paragraph (17) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 8    1987. Juvenile specialists may complete questioning of 9    juveniles on school grounds as provided under Section 10    22-88 of the School Code. 11        (6) Peer support program; training. The Division of 12    the Academy and Training shall cooperate with the Office 13    of the Director to provide peer support advisors with 14    appropriate specialized training in counseling to conduct 15    peer support counseling sessions under Section 10 of the 16    First Responders Suicide Prevention Act. 17        (7) Police dog training standards; training. All 18    police dogs used by the Illinois State Police for drug 19    enforcement purposes pursuant to the Cannabis Control Act, 20    the Illinois Controlled Substances Act, and the 21    Methamphetamine Control and Community Protection Act shall 22    be trained by programs that meet the certification 23    requirements set by the Director or the Director's 24    designee. Satisfactory completion of the training shall be 25    evidenced by a certificate issued by the Division of the 26    Academy and Training.  HB4775- 6 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1        (8) Safe2Help; training. The Division of the Academy 2    and Training shall cooperate with the Division of Criminal 3    Investigation to ensure all program personnel or call 4    center staff, or both, are appropriately trained in the 5    areas described in subsection (f) of Section 10 of the 6    Student Confidential Reporting Act. (10)7    (c-5) In-service training.8        (1) At least once, the Division of the Academy and 9    Training shall develop and require the following 10    in-service training opportunities to be completed by 11    Illinois State Police officers:12            (A) Cell phone medical information; training. 13        Training required under this subparagraph (A) shall 14        provide instruction on accessing and using medical 15        information stored in cell phones. The Division may 16        use the program approved under Section 2310-711 of the 17        Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of 18        the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to develop 19        the Division's program.20            (B) Autism spectrum disorders; training. Training 21        required under this subparagraph (B) shall instruct 22        Illinois State Police officers on the nature of autism 23        spectrum disorders and in identifying and 24        appropriately responding to individuals with autism 25        spectrum disorders. The Illinois State Police shall 26        review the training curriculum and may consult with   HB4775- 7 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1        the Department of Public Health or the Department of 2        Human Services to update the training curriculum as 3        needed.4        (2) At least every year, the Division of the Academy 5    and Training shall provide the following in-service 6    training to Illinois State Police officers:7            (A) Cultural diversity; training.8                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 9            (A) shall provide training and continuing 10            education to Illinois State Police officers 11            concerning cultural diversity, including topics 12            such as sensitivity toward racial and ethnic 13            differences.14                (ii) This training and continuing education 15            shall, among other things, emphasize that the 16            primary purpose of enforcement of the Illinois 17            Vehicle Code is safety and equal, uniform, and 18            non-discriminatory enforcement of the law.19            (B) Minimum annual in-service training 20        requirements. Minimum annual in-service training 21        includes:22                (i) crisis intervention training;23                (ii) emergency medical response training and 24            certification;25                (iii) firearm qualification training;26                (iv) law updates; and  HB4775- 8 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1                (v) officer wellness and mental health.2            (C) Firearms restraining orders; training. 3        Training required under this subparagraph (C) shall 4        provide instruction on the processes used to file a 5        firearms restraining order, to identify situations in 6        which a firearms restraining order is appropriate, and 7        to safely promote the usage of the firearms 8        restraining order in different situations.9        (3) At least every 3 years, the Division of the 10    Academy and Training shall provide the following 11    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:12            (A) Arrest and use of force and control tactics; 13        training. Training required under this subparagraph 14        (A) shall provide to Illinois State Police officers 15        training and continuing education concerning knowledge 16        of policies and laws regulating the use of force; 17        shall equip officers with tactics and skills, 18        including de-escalation techniques, to prevent or 19        reduce the need to use force or, when force must be 20        used, to use force that is objectively reasonable, 21        necessary, and proportional under the totality of the 22        circumstances; and shall ensure appropriate 23        supervision and accountability. The training shall 24        consist of at least 30 hours and shall include:25                (i) at least 12 hours of hands-on, 26            scenario-based role-playing;  HB4775- 9 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1                (ii) at least 6 hours of instruction on use of 2            force techniques, including the use of 3            de-escalation techniques to prevent or reduce the 4            need for force whenever safe and feasible;5                (iii) specific training on the law concerning 6            stops, searches, and the use of force under the 7            Fourth Amendment to the United States 8            Constitution;9                (iv) specific training on officer safety 10            techniques, including cover, concealment, and 11            time; and12                (v) at least 6 hours of training focused on 13            high-risk traffic stops.14            (B) Minimum triennial in-service training 15        requirements. Minimum triennial in-service training 16        required this under subparagraph (B) includes training 17        and continuing education to Illinois State Police 18        officers concerning:19                (i) constitutional and proper use of law 20            enforcement authority;21                (ii) civil and human rights;22                (iii) cultural competency, including implicit 23            bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity; and24                (iv) procedural justice.25            (C) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 26        under this subparagraph (C) must be approved by the   HB4775- 10 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1        Department of Children and Family Services as provided 2        under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 3        Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting 4        of child abuse and neglect.5            (D) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training.6                (i) Training required under this subparagraph 7            (D) shall include in-service training on sexual 8            assault and sexual abuse response and training on 9            report writing requirements, including, but not 10            limited to, the following:11                    (a) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;12                    (b) understanding the role trauma has 13                played in a victim's life;14                    (c) responding to the needs and concerns 15                of a victim;16                    (d) delivering services in a 17                compassionate, sensitive, and nonjudgmental 18                manner;19                    (e) interviewing techniques in accordance 20                with the curriculum standards in subdivision 21                (iii) of this subparagraph;22                    (f) understanding cultural perceptions and 23                common myths of sexual assault and sexual 24                abuse; and25                    (g) report writing techniques in 26                accordance with the curriculum standards in   HB4775- 11 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1                subdivision (iii) of this subparagraph and the 2                Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.3                (ii) Instructors providing training under this 4            subparagraph (G) shall have successfully completed 5            training on evidence-based, trauma-informed, 6            victim-centered responses to cases of sexual 7            assault and sexual abuse and shall have experience 8            responding to sexual assault and sexual abuse 9            cases.10                (iii) The Illinois State Police shall adopt 11            rules, in consultation with the Office of the 12            Attorney General and the Illinois Law Enforcement 13            Training Standards Board, to determine the 14            specific training requirements. The rules adopted 15            by the Illinois State Police shall include, at a 16            minimum, both of the following:17                    (a) evidence-based curriculum standards 18                for report writing and immediate response to 19                sexual assault and sexual abuse, including 20                trauma-informed, victim-centered interview 21                techniques, which have been demonstrated to 22                minimize retraumatization, for all Illinois 23                State Police officers; and24                    (b) evidence-based curriculum standards 25                for trauma-informed, victim-centered 26                investigation and interviewing techniques,   HB4775- 12 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1                which have been demonstrated to minimize 2                retraumatization, for cases of sexual assault 3                and sexual abuse for all Illinois State Police 4                officers who conduct sexual assault and sexual 5                abuse investigations.6        (4) At least every 5 years, the Division of the 7    Academy and Training shall provide the following 8    in-service training to Illinois State Police officers:9            (A) Psychology of domestic violence; training. 10        Training under this subparagraph (A) shall provide aid 11        in understanding the actions of domestic violence 12        victims and abusers and the actions needed to prevent 13        further victimization of those who have been abused. 14        The training shall focus specifically on looking 15        beyond physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 16        violence situations by studying the dynamics of the 17        aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 18        claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 19        assessing the long-term effects of domestic violence 20        situations.21    (c-10) Cadet training. The Division of the Academy and 22Training shall provide the following basic training to 23Illinois State Police cadets or ensure the following training 24was completed prior to an Illinois State Police cadet becoming 25an Illinois State Police officer:26        (1) Animal fighting awareness and humane response;   HB4775- 13 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    training. Training required under this paragraph (1) shall 2    include a training program in animal fighting awareness 3    and humane response for Illinois State Police cadets. The 4    purpose of that training shall be for Illinois State 5    Police officers to identify animal fighting operations and 6    respond appropriately. Training under this paragraph (1) 7    shall include a humane response component that provides 8    guidelines for appropriate law enforcement response to 9    animal abuse, cruelty, and neglect, or similar condition, 10    as well as training on canine behavior and nonlethal ways 11    to subdue a canine.12        (2) Arrest and use of force and control tactics and 13    officer safety; training. Training required under this 14    paragraph (2) must include, without limitation, training 15    on officer safety techniques, such as cover, concealment, 16    and time.17        (3) Arrest of a parent or an immediate family member; 18    training. Training required under this paragraph (3) shall 19    instruct Illinois State Police cadets on trauma-informed 20    responses designed to ensure the physical safety and 21    well-being of a child of an arrested parent or immediate 22    family member, which must include, without limitation: (A) 23    training in understanding the trauma experienced by the 24    child while maintaining the integrity of the arrest and 25    safety of officers, suspects, and other involved 26    individuals; (B) training in de-escalation tactics that   HB4775- 14 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    would include the use of force when reasonably necessary; 2    and (C) training in understanding and inquiring whether a 3    child will require supervision and care.4        (4) Autism and other developmental or physical 5    disabilities; training. Training required under this 6    paragraph (4) shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets 7    on identifying and interacting with persons with autism 8    and other developmental or physical disabilities, reducing 9    barriers to reporting crimes against persons with autism, 10    and addressing the unique challenges presented by cases 11    involving victims or witnesses with autism and other 12    developmental disabilities.13        (5) Cell phone medical information; training. Training 14    required under this paragraph (5) shall instruct Illinois 15    State Police cadets to access and use medical information 16    stored in cell phones. The Division of the Academy and 17    Training may use the program approved under Section 18    2310-711 of the Department of Public Health Powers and 19    Duties Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois to 20    develop the training required under this paragraph (5). 21        (6) Compliance with the Health Care Violence 22    Prevention Act; training. Training required under this 23    paragraph (6) shall provide an appropriate level of 24    training for Illinois State Police cadets concerning the 25    Health Care Violence Prevention Act.26        (7) Constitutional law; training. Training required   HB4775- 15 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    under this paragraph (7) shall instruct Illinois State 2    Police cadets on constitutional and proper use of law 3    enforcement authority, procedural justice, civil rights, 4    human rights, and cultural competency, including implicit 5    bias and racial and ethnic sensitivity.6        (8) Courtroom testimony; training.7        (9) Crime victims; training. Training required under 8    this paragraph (9) shall provide instruction in techniques 9    designed to promote effective communication at the initial 10    contact with crime victims and to comprehensively explain 11    to victims and witnesses their rights under the Rights of 12    Crime Victims and Witnesses Act and the Crime Victims 13    Compensation Act.14        (10) Criminal law; training.15        (11) Crisis intervention team and mental health 16    awareness; training. Training required under this 17    paragraph (11) shall include a specialty certification 18    course of at least 40 hours, addressing specialized 19    policing responses to people with mental illnesses. The 20    Division of the Academy and Training shall conduct Crisis 21    Intervention Team training programs that train officers to 22    identify signs and symptoms of mental illness, to 23    de-escalate situations involving individuals who appear to 24    have a mental illness and connect individuals in crisis to 25    treatment.26        (12) Cultural diversity; training.  HB4775- 16 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1            (A) The training required under this paragraph 2        (12) shall provide training to Illinois State Police 3        cadets concerning cultural competency and cultural 4        diversity, including sensitivity toward racial and 5        ethnic differences.6            (B) This training shall include, but not be 7        limited to, an emphasis on the fact that the primary 8        purpose of enforcement of the Illinois Vehicle Code is 9        safety, equal, and uniform and non-discriminatory 10        enforcement under the law.11        (13) De-escalation and use of force; training. 12    Training required under this paragraph (13) must consist 13    of at least 6 hours of instruction on use of force 14    techniques, including the use of de-escalation techniques 15    to prevent or reduce the need for force whenever safe and 16    feasible.17        (14) Domestic violence; training. Training required 18    under this paragraph (14) shall provide aid in 19    understanding the actions of domestic violence victims and 20    abusers and to prevent further victimization of those who 21    have been abused, focusing specifically on looking beyond 22    the physical evidence to the psychology of domestic 23    violence situations, such as the dynamics of the 24    aggressor-victim relationship, separately evaluating 25    claims where both parties claim to be the victim, and 26    long-term effects.  HB4775- 17 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1        (15) Effective recognition of and responses to stress, 2    trauma, and post-traumatic stress; training. Training 3    required under this paragraph (15) shall instruct Illinois 4    State Police cadets to recognize and respond to stress, 5    trauma, and post-traumatic stress experienced by law 6    enforcement officers. The training must be consistent with 7    Section 25 of the Illinois Mental Health First Aid 8    Training Act in a peer setting, including recognizing 9    signs and symptoms of work-related cumulative stress, 10    issues that may lead to suicide, and solutions for 11    intervention with peer support resources.12        (16) Elder abuse; training. Training required under 13    this paragraph (16) shall teach Illinois State Police 14    cadets to recognize neglect and financial exploitation 15    against the elderly and adults with disabilities. The 16    training shall also teach Illinois State Police cadets to 17    recognize self-neglect by the elderly and adults with 18    disabilities. In this subparagraph, "adults with 19    disabilities" has the meaning given to that term in the 20    Adult Protective Services Act.21        (17) Electronic control devices; training. Training 22    required under this paragraph (17) shall include training 23    in the use of electronic control devices, including the 24    psychological and physiological effects of the use of 25    those devices on humans.26        (18) Epinephrine auto-injector administration;   HB4775- 18 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    training. Training required under this paragraph (18) 2    shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to recognize 3    and respond to anaphylaxis. The training must comply with 4    subsection (c) of Section 40 of the Illinois State Police 5    Act.6        (19) Evidence collection; training. Training required 7    under this paragraph (19) must include proper procedures 8    for collecting, handling, and preserving evidence, and 9    rules of law.10        (20) Firearms restraining orders; training. Providing 11    instruction on the process used to file a firearms 12    restraining order and how to identify situations in which 13    a firearms restraining order is appropriate and how to 14    safely promote the usage of the firearms restraining order 15    in different situations.16        (21) Firearms; training. Successful completion of a 17    40-hour course of training in use of a suitable type 18    firearm shall be a condition precedent to the possession 19    and use of that respective firearm in connection with the 20    officer's official duties. To satisfy the requirements of 21    this Act, the training must include the following:22            (A) Instruction in the dangers of misuse of the 23        firearm, safety rules, and care and cleaning of the 24        firearm.25            (B) Practice firing on a range and qualification 26        with the firearm in accordance with the standards   HB4775- 19 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1        established by the Board.2            (C) Instruction in the legal use of firearms under 3        the Criminal Code of 2012 and relevant court 4        decisions.5            (D) A forceful presentation of the ethical and 6        moral considerations assumed by any person who uses a 7        firearm.8        (22) First-aid; training. First-aid training must 9    include cardiopulmonary resuscitation.10        (23) Hate crimes; training. Training required under 11    this paragraph (23) shall instruct Illinois State Police 12    cadets in identifying, responding to, and reporting all 13    hate crimes.14        (24) High-risk traffic stops; training. Training 15    required under this paragraph (24) must consist of at 16    least 6 hours of training focused on high-risk traffic 17    stops.18        (25) High-speed vehicle chase; training. Training 19    required under this paragraph (25) shall instruct Illinois 20    State Police cadets on the hazards of high-speed police 21    vehicle chases with an emphasis on alternatives to the 22    high-speed vehicle chase.23        (26) Human relations; training.24        (27) Human trafficking; training. Training required 25    under this paragraph (27) shall instruct Illinois State 26    Police cadets in the detection and investigation of all   HB4775- 20 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    forms of human trafficking, including, but not limited to, 2    involuntary servitude under subsection (b) of Section 10-9 3    of the Criminal Code of 2012, involuntary sexual servitude 4    of a minor under subsection (c) of Section 10-9 of the 5    Criminal Code of 2012, and trafficking in persons under 6    subsection (d) of Section 10-9 of the Criminal Code of 7    2012. This program shall be made available to all cadets 8    and Illinois State Police officers.9        (28) Juvenile law; training. Training required under 10    this paragraph (28) shall instruct Illinois State Police 11    cadets on juvenile law and the proper processing and 12    handling of juvenile offenders.13        (29) Mandated reporter; training. Training required 14    under this paragraph (29) must be approved by the 15    Department of Children and Family Services as provided 16    under Section 4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 17    Reporting Act and includes training on the reporting of 18    child abuse and neglect.19        (30) Mental conditions and crises, training. Training 20    required under this paragraph (30) shall include, without 21    limitation, (A) recognizing the disease of addiction, (B) 22    recognizing situations which require immediate assistance, 23    and (C) responding in a manner that safeguards and 24    provides assistance to individuals in need of mental 25    treatment.26        (31) Officer wellness and suicide prevention;   HB4775- 21 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    training. The training required under this paragraph (31) 2    shall include instruction on job-related stress management 3    techniques, skills for recognizing signs and symptoms of 4    work-related cumulative stress, recognition of other 5    issues that may lead to officer suicide, solutions for 6    intervention, and a presentation on available peer support 7    resources.8        (32) Officer-worn body cameras; training.9            (A) As used in this paragraph (32), "officer-worn 10        body camera" has the meaning given to that term in 11        Article 10 of the Law Enforcement Officer-Worn Body 12        Camera Act.13            (B) The training required under this paragraph 14        (32) shall provide training in the use of officer-worn 15        body cameras to cadets who will use officer-worn body 16        cameras.17        (33) Opioid antagonists; training.18            (A) As used in this paragraph (33), "opioid 19        antagonist" has the meaning given to that term in 20        subsection (e) of Section 5-23 of the Substance Use 21        Disorder Act.22            (B) Training required under this paragraph (33) 23        shall instruct Illinois State Police cadets to 24        administer opioid antagonists.25        (34) Persons arrested while under the influence of 26    alcohol or drugs; training. Training required under this   HB4775- 22 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    paragraph (34) shall comply with Illinois State Police 2    policy adopted under Section 2605-54. The training shall 3    be consistent with the Substance Use Disorder Act and 4    shall provide guidance for the arrest of persons under the 5    influence of alcohol or drugs, proper medical attention if 6    warranted, and care and release of those persons from 7    custody. The training shall provide guidance concerning 8    the release of persons arrested under the influence of 9    alcohol or drugs who are under the age of 21 years of age, 10    which shall include, but shall not be limited to, 11    instructions requiring the arresting officer to make a 12    reasonable attempt to contact a responsible adult who is 13    willing to take custody of the person who is under the 14    influence of alcohol or drugs.15        (35) Physical training.16        (36) Post-traumatic stress disorder; training. 17    Training required under this paragraph (36) shall equip 18    Illinois State Police cadets to identify the symptoms of 19    post-traumatic stress disorder and to respond 20    appropriately to individuals exhibiting those symptoms.21        (37) Report writing; training. Training required under 22    this paragraph (37) shall instruct Illinois State Police 23    cadets on writing reports and proper documentation of 24    statements.25        (38) Scenario training. At least 12 hours of hands-on, 26    scenario-based role-playing.  HB4775- 23 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1        (39) Search and seizure; training. Training required 2    under this paragraph (39) shall instruct Illinois State 3    Police cadets on search and seizure, including temporary 4    questioning.5        (40) Sexual assault and sexual abuse; training. 6    Training required under this paragraph (40) shall instruct 7    Illinois State Police cadets on sexual assault and sexual 8    abuse response and report writing training requirements, 9    including, but not limited to, the following:10            (A) recognizing the symptoms of trauma;11            (B) understanding the role trauma has played in a 12        victim's life;13            (C) responding to the needs and concerns of a 14        victim;15            (D) delivering services in a compassionate, 16        sensitive, and nonjudgmental manner;17            (E) interviewing techniques in accordance with the 18        curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 19        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act;20            (F) understanding cultural perceptions and common 21        myths of sexual assault and sexual abuse; and22            (G) report-writing techniques in accordance with 23        the curriculum standards in subsection (f) of Section 24        10.19 of the Illinois Police Training Act and the 25        Sexual Assault Incident Procedure Act.26        (41) Traffic control and crash investigation;   HB4775- 24 -LRB104 18283 RTM 31723 b1    training. 2    (d) The Division of the Academy and Training shall 3administer and conduct a program consistent with 18 U.S.C. 4926B and 926C for qualified active and retired Illinois State 5Police officers. 6(Source: P.A. 103-34, eff. 1-1-24; 103-939, eff. 1-1-25; 7103-949, eff. 1-1-25; 104-24, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 88-15-25; revised 9-10-25.)